Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-903
Bail; amount; pretrial release agency; release recommendation; release without bond; when.

In fixing the amount of bail, the judge admitting to the same shall be governed in the amount and quality of bail required by the direction of the district court in all cases where such court shall have made any order or direction in that behalf. In the event that the district court shall designate an official pretrial release agency for the district, the judge may give consideration to a report and recommendation of such agency and in the event that such agency should recommend the release of the prisoner on his own recognizance, the court may order release of such prisoner without the necessity of posting a cash deposit or requiring the sureties set out in section 29-901.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 348, p. 802;

R.S.1913, § 9005;

C.S.1922, § 10029;

C.S.1929, § 29-903;

R.S.1943, § 29-903;

Laws 1971, LB 316, § 1;

Laws 1972, LB 1248, § 1;

Laws 1974, LB 828, § 8.